Hawaii statutes.
§532-14 Disposition by State. If the
intestate leaves no kindred, the intestate's estate shall be disposed of as
provided in chapter 523A. [CC 1859, §1451; RL 1925, §3315; RL 1935, §4823; RL
1945, §12083; RL 1955, §318-14; HRS §532-14; am L 1974, c 75, §6; am L 1985, c
68, §25]

Case Notes

"Kindred", meaning of. 4 H. 221, 225.

Cited: 3 H. 262, 268; 20 H. 114, 116.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next